Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.010

Intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to strengthen and consolidate disciplinary and licensure procedures for the licensed health and health-related professions and businesses by providing a uniform disciplinary act with standardized procedures for the licensure of health care professionals and the enforcement of laws the purpose of which is to assure the public of the adequacy of professional competence and conduct in the healing arts.

It is also the intent of the legislature that all health and health-related professions newly credentialed by the state come under the Uniform Disciplinary Act.

Further, the legislature declares that the addition of public members on all health care commissions and boards can give both the state and the public, which it has a statutory responsibility to protect, assurances of accountability and confidence in the various practices of health care.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 601; 1991 c 332 s 1; 1986 c 259 s 1; 1984 c 279 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Application to scope of practice—1991 c 332: "Nothing in sections 1 through 39 of this act is intended to change the scope of practice of any health care profession referred to in sections 1 through 39 of this act." [ 1991 c 332 s 46.]

Captions not law—1991 c 332: "Section captions and part headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law." [ 1991 c 332 s 43.]

Severability—1986 c 259: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 259 s 152.]